Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 6 Indigent Care Trust Fund

Administrative rules and regulations.

Hospital care for the indigent, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-5.

Indigent care trust fund-nursing home provider fee, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Medical Assistance, Chapter 350-7.

31-8-150.
Constitutional authority for passage of article.

This article is passed pursuant to the authority of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(i) of the Constitution.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-150

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 139, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 31; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1.

31-8-151.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Community Health created by Chapter 2 of this title.

“Medically indigent” means a person who meets the state-wide standards of indigency adopted by the department for the purposes of this article.

“Trust fund” means the Indigent Care Trust Fund created by Code Section 31-8-152.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-151

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 139, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 9; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-8/HB 228.

31-8-152.
Creation of Indigent Care Trust Fund.

There is created the Indigent Care Trust Fund as a separate fund in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall credit to the trust fund all amounts dedicated, transferred, or contributed to such trust fund and shall invest the trust fund moneys in the same manner as authorized for investing other moneys in the state treasury.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-152

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 139, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

31-8-152.1.
[Repealed] State sales and use taxation of certain health care services.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-152.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 674, § 1-1/HB 117 and was repealed by its own terms effective June 30, 2014; repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 674, § 1-1/HB 117, effective June 30, 2014.

31-8-153.
Contributions to trust fund.

After June 30, 1990, any hospital, hospital authority, county, municipality, or other person or entity is authorized to contribute to the trust fund.
The contribution of public funds to the trust fund shall be a valid public purpose for which those funds may be expended.
Contributions to the trust fund shall be irrevocable and shall not include any limitation upon the use of such contributions except as permitted in this article or by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-153

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 139, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1.

31-8-153.1.
Irrevocable transfer of funds to trust fund; provision for indigent patients.

After June 30, 1993, any hospital authority, county, municipality, or other state or local public or governmental entity is authorized to transfer moneys to the trust fund. Transfer of funds under the control of a hospital authority, county, municipality, or other state or local public or governmental entity shall be a valid public purpose for which those funds may be expended. The department is authorized to transfer to the trust fund moneys paid to the state by a health care facility as a monetary penalty for the violation of an agreement to provide a specified amount of clinical health services to indigent patients pursuant to a certificate of need held by such facility. Such transfers shall be irrevocable and shall be used only for the purposes contained in Code Section 31-8-154.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-153.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1240, § 3.

31-8-153.2.
Revenues raised from specified sources.

The General Assembly may provide for the dedication and deposit of revenues raised from specified sources into the trust fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-153.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1.

31-8-153.3.
No lapse of contributions to the general fund.

Contributions and revenues deposited and transferred to the trust fund shall not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-153.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1.

31-8-154.
Authorized expenditure of contributed funds.

All moneys contributed and revenues deposited and transferred to the trust fund pursuant to this article and any interest earned on such moneys shall be appropriated to the department for only the following purposes:

To expand Medicaid eligibility and services;

For programs to support rural and other health care providers, primarily hospitals, who serve the medically indigent;

For primary health care programs for medically indigent citizens and children of this state; or

Any combination of purposes specified in paragraphs (1) through (3) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-154

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 139, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 3/SB 308; Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 2-6/SB 193.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added “or” at the end of paragraph (3); deleted former paragraph (4), which read: “For the Positive Alternatives for Pregnancy and Parenting Grant Program established under Article 2 of Chapter 2A of this title; or”; redesignated former paragraph (5) as present paragraph (4); and substituted “(3)” for “(4)” near the end of present paragraph (4).

31-8-155.
Promulgation of rules for funding expansions of eligibility and indigent care programs.

The department shall establish by rules the purposes for which contributions and transfers to the trust fund may be made. Such purposes shall be consistent with the purposes contained in Code Section 31-8-154. Those rules shall be promulgated by the Board of Community Health pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” notwithstanding any exclusion or exemption otherwise provided in that chapter.

Contributions to the trust fund shall be made within such time periods as the department establishes by rule pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section.

The department may make and execute contracts, agreements, and other instruments for the purpose of facilitating transfers to the trust fund.

The department shall establish the manner of disbursement of any funds appropriated to it pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-155

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 139, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 388, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Indigent Care Trust Fund, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Medical Assistance, Chapter 111-3-6.

31-8-156.
Appropriation of state funds by General Assembly.

The General Assembly is authorized to appropriate as state funds to the department for use in any fiscal year not less than all of the moneys contributed and revenues deposited and transferred to the fund and interest earned thereon. Such appropriation shall be made only for those purposes specified in Code Section 31-8-154, and any other appropriation from the trust fund shall be void.

An appropriation pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall specify each purpose, if any, as specified in paragraphs (1) through (4) of Code Section 31-8-154, for which the trust funds are appropriated thereby.

Funds appropriated to the department pursuant to this Code section shall be used to match federal funds or any other funds from a public source or charitable organization which are available for the purposes for which those trust funds have been appropriated.

Appropriations from the trust fund to the department shall be used to supplement and not replace any other state funds appropriated to the department.

Appropriations from the trust fund to the department, except as provided in Code Sections 31-8-157 and 31-8-158, shall not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-156

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 139, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1240, § 4; Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 4/SB 308; Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 2-7/SB 193.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “(4)” for “(5)” in the middle of subsection (b).

31-8-157.
Refunding contributed funds; penalties not refunded.

All contributions to the trust fund and interest earned thereon which have been appropriated but which:

Were void because of having been appropriated in violation of Code Section 31-8-156;

Remain unexpended and not contractually obligated at the end of the fiscal year for which they were appropriated; or

Are determined by the department to be ineligible for anticipated federal matching funds or other matching funds from a public source or charitable organization

shall be returned to the trust fund and shall not lapse but shall be refunded pro rata to the contributors thereof, except that penalties so transferred to the fund shall not be refunded. The Office of Planning and Budget shall determine the amount required to be refunded and the pro rata distribution thereof within 60 days following the end of each fiscal year or, when the department has made a determination pursuant to paragraph (3) of this Code section, within 60 days after that determination. The amount so determined shall be refunded by the state treasurer within 60 days following that determination.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-157

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 139, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1240, § 5; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

31-8-158.
Refunding funds not appropriated or determined void or ineligible.

Moneys transferred to the trust fund and interest earned thereon which have not been appropriated by the end of the fiscal year or which have been appropriated but have been determined to be:

Void because of having been appropriated in violation of Code Section 31-8-156;

Ineligible for anticipated federal matching funds;

Subject to return pursuant to any rule promulgated under Code Section 31-8-155; or

Void because of violation of the terms of a contract, agreement, or other instrument executed pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 31-8-155

shall be returned to the trust fund and refunded pro rata to the entities responsible for transfer. The refund shall be made by the state treasurer no less than 30 days following the end of the fiscal year or such a determination by the department, as applicable.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-158

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1, effective April 13, 1993, renumbered former Code Section 31-8-158 as present Code Section 31-8-159.

31-8-159.
Reporting requirements.

The department shall annually report to the General Assembly on its use of trust funds appropriated to the department pursuant to this article.

The department shall also provide an annual report no later than September 30 of each year which shall provide the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year:

The amount of ambulance service license fees received by the department pursuant to Code Section 31-11-31.1;

The amount of federal funds received as matching funds to the corresponding ambulance service license fees received; and

The total amount of funds disbursed to emergency ambulance services from the Indigent Care Trust Fund.

The report required by this subsection shall be made available to the public free of charge by electronic means and in such other manner as the department deems appropriate.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-158

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 139, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-8-159

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 266, § 1/SB 479.

31-8-160.
Applicability of Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49.

Except where inconsistent with this article, the provisions of Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49, the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977,” shall apply to the department in carrying out the purposes of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-159

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 139, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-8-160

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1014, § 1.